Nebraska statutes.
71-557
Department; duties; rules and regulations.

The department
shall:

(1) In consultation
with a panel of persons having expertise in the field of critical congenital
heart disease screening, develop approved methods of critical congenital heart
disease screening;

(2) Apply for all available federal funding to carry out the Newborn
Critical Congenital Heart Disease Screening Act; and

(3) Adopt and promulgate
rules and regulations necessary to implement the act.

Laws 2013, LB225, § 5.
September 6, 2013